fst/lexc/git_irregular.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+VI
+SUB
+AUX
+MOD
+PRO
+OBL
2SG
-2SG.II
-2PL.II
-3.II
=CN
=PN
=1.I
=2.I

LEXICON Root
	Exceptions ;

LEXICON Exceptions
w$il+VI-2SG.II:win		Word ;
w$il+VI-2PL.II:wisi'm	Word ;
w$il+VI=CN:wihl		# ;
w$il+VI[-3.II]=CN:wihl	# ;
w$il+VI[-3.II]=PN:wis	# ;

y$ee+VI-2SG.II:yin 	Word ;

w$in+SUB=1.I:wina		# ;
n$ee+AUX=d$im+MOD:nem	# ;
d$im+MOD=2.I:dima	# ;

2SG+OBL:lun 		Word ;
3.III+PRO=CN:'nihl		# ;
